Utah statutes.
58-37c-12.   Grounds for denial of license -- Disciplinary proceedings.
Grounds for refusal to issue a license to an applicant, for refusal to renew
the license of a licensee, to revoke, suspend, restrict, or place on probation
the license of a licensee, to issue a public or private reprimand to a
licensee, and to issue cease and desist orders shall be in accordance with
Section 58-1-401.
